extensions/1013418_russian-english-dictionary/russian_english_dictionary-1.1/dictionaries/Russian-English_Bilingual.aff
SFX 497 Y 4
SFX 497   y     ies        [^aeiou]y
SFX 497   0     s          [aeiou]y
SFX 497   0     es         [sxzh]
SFX 497   0     s          [^sxzhy]

SFX 498 N 4
SFX 498   0     st         e
SFX 498   y     iest       [^aeiou]y
SFX 498   0     est        [aeiou]y
SFX 498   0     est        [^ey]

SFX 499 N 4
SFX 499   0     st         e
SFX 499   y     iest       [^aeiou]y
SFX 499   0     est        [aeiou]y
SFX 499   0     est        [^ey]

SFX 500 N 2
SFX 500   e     ive        e
SFX 500   0     ive        [^e]

SFX 501 N 2
SFX 501   e     ive        e
SFX 501   0     ive        [^e]

SFX 502 Y 3
SFX 502   e     ions       e
SFX 502   y     ications   y
SFX 502   0     ens        [^ey]

SFX 503 Y 3
SFX 503   e     ions       e
SFX 503   y     ications   y
SFX 503   0     ens        [^ey]

SFX 504 Y 1
SFX 504   0     ly         .

SFX 505 Y 1
SFX 505   0     ly         .

SFX 506 Y 4
SFX 506   0     rs         e
SFX 506   y     iers       [^aeiou]y
SFX 506   0     ers        [aeiou]y
SFX 506   0     ers        [^ey]

SFX 507 Y 4
SFX 507   0     rs         e
SFX 507   y     iers       [^aeiou]y
SFX 507   0     ers        [aeiou]y
SFX 507   0     ers        [^ey]
